Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Diesel Fuel Taxes
§ 39-17-207.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports required by this subsection shall be filed on or before the last day of the month, and the following shall apply:

Each person transporting, conveying or bringing diesel fuels into this state for sale, use or distribution in this state shall furnish the department a verified statement showing the number of gallons of diesel fuels delivered during the preceding reporting period, the name of the person to whom the delivery was made and the place of delivery. This subsection does not apply to a person who transports less than fifty (50) gallons of diesel fuel into this state in the fuel supply tanks of a motor vehicle for use in that vehicle;

Each person who exports diesel fuels from this state shall report the number of gallons exported, destination state and the name of the person to whom exported;

Each dealer, who is not licensed as a distributor, shall submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department showing the number of billed gallons of diesel fuel acquired, the distributor or importer who supplied the diesel fuel and collected the tax and the total gallons sold during the preceding calendar month;

Each distributor shall submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department. Distributors may include in their reports the amount of the tax exempt bulk deliveries for authorized agricultural purposes;

Each supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter, distributor and dealer shall keep and preserve the records relating to the purchase and sale of diesel fuels three (3) years. The department may authorize, by rule, alternate methods of preserving records required under this section;

Each person transporting, conveying or importing diesel fuels into the state or producing, refining, manufacturing, blending or compounding and using, selling or distributing diesel fuels for sale or use in this state shall keep the records relating to the purchase or sale of for three (3) years;

A person shall not transport motor fuel by railroad tank car or transport truck unless the person has a shipping document for its transportation that complies with this section. A terminal operator and the operator of a bulk plant shall give a shipping document to the person who operates a railroad tank car or a transport truck into which motor fuel is loaded at the terminal rack or bulk plant rack. A shipping document issued by a terminal operator or the operator of a bulk plant shall contain the following information:

The identification, including address, of the terminal or bulk plant from which the motor fuel was received;

The date the motor fuel was removed;

The amount of motor fuel removed, indicating gross or net gallons;

The destination state of the motor fuel, as represented to the terminal operator by the transporter, the shipper or the shipper’s agent;

The name of the shipper of the diesel fuel within the bulk plant or terminal;

The consignee’s name and address;

The transporter’s name;

Any other information required by the department for the enforcement of this article.

A person to whom a shipping document was issued shall:

Carry the shipping document in the conveyance for which it was issued when transporting the motor fuel described in it;

Show the shipping document to a law enforcement officer or authorized personnel of the department upon request;

Deliver the motor fuel described in the shipping document to the destination state printed on it unless the person does all of the following:

Notifies the department when transporting the motor fuel into a state other than the printed destination state that the person has received instructions for since the shipping document was issued to deliver the motor fuel to a different destination state;

Writes on the shipping document the change in destination state;

Gives a copy of the shipping document to the distributor or other person to whom the motor fuel is delivered.

A person to whom motor fuel is delivered by railroad tank car or transport truck shall not accept delivery of the motor fuel if the destination state shown on the shipping document for the motor fuel is a state other than Wyoming. The person to whom the fuel is delivered shall examine the shipping document and keep a copy of the shipping document;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 11, § 2.

Each carrier licensed under the provisions of the international fuel tax agreement shall file in a format required by the department a report indicating the total number of miles traveled in all jurisdictions by the operator’s vehicles subject to the tax under this article, the total number of miles traveled by those vehicles in this state, the amount of diesel fuel used by those vehicles in all jurisdictions, the amount of tax under this article paid during the calendar quarter and any other information required by the department to compute the licensee’s tax liability. The licensee shall pay all taxes due under this article at the time the report is filed. If the tax on diesel fuel imported into this state in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles for taxable use on Wyoming highways can be more accurately determined on a mileage basis the department may approve and adopt that basis. In the absence of mileage records showing the number of miles actually operated per gallon of diesel fuel consumed, it shall be presumed that not less than one (1) gallon of diesel fuel was consumed for every four (4) miles traveled. The department shall by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 39-17-202(a) prescribe procedures under which a diesel user who is entitled to at least a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) refund of tax under this article for purchases and use of fuel in any calendar month may apply for and receive the refund at any time after the last day of that month.

Payment. The following shall apply:

On or before the last day of each month:

When diesel fuel is purchased in Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed supplier, the supplier shall report to the department all gallons used, sold or distributed in the state during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due;

When diesel fuel is purchased out of the state for use, sale or distribution in Wyoming, the Wyoming licensed supplier shall report all gallons used, sold or distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due under this article;

When diesel fuel is purchased in Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed refiner, the Wyoming licensed refiner shall report all gallons used, sold or distributed in Wyoming during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due;

A licensed importer shall report all gallons imported during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes due unless the tax has been paid to an out-of-state supplier;

Any person acquiring blending components for the purpose of blending with diesel fuel shall report all gallons purchased and blended during the preceding calendar month and remit all additional taxes due on the blending components.

The supplier, refiner or importer shall not require payment from the licensed distributor of the license taxes imposed under this article until three (3) business days prior to the date which the taxes are required to be remitted to the state by the supplier, refiner or importer. A licensed distributor may elect to make delayed payments to a licensed supplier, refiner or importer, provided:

If the supplier, refiner or importer has an electronic funds transfer program in operation, the payment is made by electronic funds transfer;

The distributor continues to make timely payments to the supplier, refiner or importer.

A distributor or importer who owns a bulk plant in this state may take a shrinkage credit of one percent (1%) on gross gallons of bulk diesel purchased directly from a terminal and delivered in this state for use, sale or distribution. This credit may be claimed on the monthly tax return. A distributor or importer who does not own a bulk plant, but owns retail locations and distributes diesel to those locations only shall be entitled to the shrinkage credit on gross gallons of bulk diesel delivered.

Timelines. The following shall apply:

Any report, claims, tax return, statement or other document or payments required by this article to be made to or filed with the department and which is:

Transmitted through United States mail:

Is deemed filed and received by the department on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped on the envelope or other appropriate wrapper containing it;

But not received by the department, is deemed filed and received on the date mailed if the sender establishes it was deposited in the mail on or before the due date for filing and submits a duplicate within thirty (30) days following written notification by the department of the nonreceipt;

Was received but the cancellation mark is illegible, erroneous or omitted is deemed filed and received on the date mailed if the sender establishes it was deposited in the mail on or before the due date for filing.

Received through electronic funds transfer, the funds shall be deemed received when the electronic funds transmission is received by the department;

Received through electronic data interchange, the data shall be deemed received when the electronic data interchange transmission is received by the department.

Any tax return or license application that is not signed and any tax return which does not contain all pertinent information is considered not filed until the licensee signs or supplies the required information to the department. If the information required in the documents is presented to the department in a format other than that prescribed or otherwise approved by the department, the tax return, application or claim for refund or credit shall be deemed not filed. The licensee shall have ten (10) days to provide the information requested in a manner prescribed or otherwise approved by the department. If the licensee provides the information requested by the department within ten (10) days, the tax return or license application shall be deemed to have been timely filed;

Evidence that correspondence mailed from the department to the last known address of a person shall be deemed prima facie evidence that the person received the correspondence after five (5) business days have elapsed from the date the correspondence was mailed. As used in this section, “last known address” means the most current address on file with the department.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to define the reporting format requirement for all licensees.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 1999, ch. 14, § 1; ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “in a format required” for “on forms furnished” throughout, rewrote the introductory language inserting “required by this subsection shall be filed on or before the last day of the month, and the”; deleted the second sentence which related to the time limitation for returning forms to the department in (i); in (iii), repealed (x), which read: “To the extent practicable, the department shall provide for the furnishing of forms to report the sales of diesel fuels for delivery or use in this state by any person”; deleted “on or before the last business day of each month” at the beginning; in (xi), deleted “On or before the last day of the calendar month following each calendar quarter” preceding “Each carrier,” deleted “signed by the operator”; substituted “day of each month” for “business day of each calendar month” in (b)(i); added (d); and made stylistic and related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-904, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-904 by ch. 51, § 2, were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, also amended W.S. 39-6-906, which was also repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments to § 39-6-906 by ch. 51 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, also amended W.S. 39-6-908, which was also repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4.

§ 39-17-208.
Enforcement.

Audits. The following shall apply:

All tax records specified in this article are open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his deputies;

An agreement may provide for each member jurisdiction to audit the records of persons based in the jurisdiction to determine if the motor fuel taxes due each jurisdiction are properly reported and paid. Each state shall forward the findings of the audits performed on persons based in the jurisdiction to each jurisdiction in which the person has taxable use of motor fuels. For persons not based in this state and who have taxable use of motor fuel in this state, the department may serve the audit findings received from another jurisdiction, in the form of an assessment, on the person as though an audit was conducted by the department;

Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection does not preclude the department from auditing the records of any licensee under this chapter.

Interest. The license taxes and penalty shall be collected by the department together with one percent (1%) per month or fractional part thereof on the license taxes from the due date until payment.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

Any person who conducts the business of a supplier, refiner, terminal operator, distributor, exporter or importer without holding a valid license as specified in W.S.

39-17-206

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. Each day in violation of the provisions of this section constitutes a separate offense;

If any person fails or refuses to file the required statement or reports and remit the tax as provided by W.S. 39-17-207(a)(i)(A), (b)(i) and

39-17-206

(f) and the department shall make a statement for that person from the best information available and from that statement shall determine the amount of the license and use taxes required to be paid and shall add a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the taxes due. The department shall notify the delinquent taxpayer of the total amount due by serving written notice upon the person personally or by the United States mail to the last known address as shown on the records of the department. If the delinquent taxpayer proves to the department that the delinquency was due to a reasonable cause, the department shall waive the penalty provided in this subsection. If the delinquent taxpayer after receiving the statement prepared by the department later renders to the department a true statement covering the same reporting period, the department shall use such statement, adding the penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest of one percent (1%) per month or fractional part thereof on the license taxes from the due date until payment. The penalty shall be waived by the department upon satisfactory written proof the delinquency was due to a reasonable cause. The department may suspend the license issued under this article of any person who fails or refuses to file required statements or reports and remit the tax as required under this article;

Any person who fails to furnish any report or remit any license tax to the department as required by this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each offense is punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. In addition, the department may suspend or revoke any license held by the offender and may require the offender, as a condition of any future licensing under this article, to provide a surety bond, cash bond or certificate of deposit as provided in W.S. 39-17-206(k);

Any supplier, refiner, terminal operator, distributor, exporter or importer selling diesel fuels subject to the license taxes imposed by this article while delinquent in the payment of any such taxes is liable for double the amount due to be recovered in a suit instituted by and in the name of the state of Wyoming. Upon application made by the state a writ of injunction may be issued, without requiring bond, against the defendants enjoining and restraining them from selling or offering to sell in the state diesel fuels until the license taxes are paid. Upon application made by the state a receiver of the property and business of the defendant may be appointed to impound the same as security for the delinquent tax and any judgment recovered in the suit;

Any person who makes a false statement in a report required by this article is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. In addition, the person shall forfeit all rights to a refund to the extent that the false statement resulted in a refund larger than that to which the person was lawfully entitled;

Any person who does not display the price per gallon including all applicable taxes at which diesel fuels are to be sold as provided by W.S. 39-17-203(c)(iii) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection;

Any person violating any provision of this article, or who procures, aids or abets any person in a violation or noncompliance is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both;

Except as otherwise provided for by law, no person shall operate a motor vehicle upon any public road or highway in this state with dyed diesel fuel contained in the tank or tanks which supply diesel fuel to the engine of the motor vehicle. A state trooper or special enforcement officer, may, during an inspection under W.S.

31-18-301

or during a weight or safety inspection, withdraw and inspect any diesel fuel. A state trooper or special enforcement officer may, upon probable cause to believe that the vehicle is operating in violation of this paragraph or other law, withdraw and inspect any diesel fuel in the supply tank or tanks of the vehicle as authorized by W.S. 31-1-203(b). Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or five dollars ($5.00) for every gallon of fuel involved, whichever is greater. The penalty under this subsection shall increase with subsequent violations by multiplying the penalty imposed by the number of prior violations;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

Liens. There are no specific applicable provisions for liens for this article.

Tax sales. There are no specific applicable provisions for tax sales for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 2008, ch. 69, § 1; 2010, ch. 72, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (c)(viii), substituted “in the tank or tanks which supply diesel fuel to the engine of the motor vehicle” for “in the supply tank of the vehicle” at the end of the first sentence, inserted the present second and third sentences, and substituted “five hundred dollars ($500.00) or five dollars ($5.00)” for “three hundred dollars ($300.00) or three dollars ($3.00)” in the second to last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c)(iii), inserted “cash bond or certificate of deposit.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-911, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-911 by ch. 51, § 2, were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-17-209.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this article.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department concerning the assessment of fuel taxes may appeal to the state board of equalization. Appeals shall be made in a timely manner as provided by rules and regulations of the board of equalization by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds for the appeal;

The department shall, in a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations, transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken;

Any person, including the department, aggrieved by any order issued by the state board of equalization may appeal the decision of the board to the first judicial district court in Laramie county;

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person aggrieved by the payment of taxes or any penalty or interest imposed by this article shall appeal a decision of the state board until all applicable taxes, penalties and interest have been paid.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

Undyed diesel fuel purchased for agricultural purposes as defined in W.S. 39-17-201(a)(i) is exempt from a percentage of the license tax under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i) as declared by the applicant;

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

The department shall by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 39-17-202(a) prescribe procedures under which a diesel fuel user who is entitled to at least a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) refund of tax under this article for purchases and use of fuel in any calendar month may apply for and receive the refund at any time after the last day of that month;

The license tax under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i) is subject to refund on the following:

Any person exporting diesel fuel for which the license tax has been paid is subject to a refund of the license tax paid. The refund request shall be submitted monthly on forms provided by or in a format required by the department. The refund request is invalid if not submitted within one (1) year of the date of purchase;

Diesel fuel sold by a distributor, importer, supplier or dealer to the state of Wyoming or any of its political subdivisions is subject to a refund;

Diesel fuel sold by a distributor, importer, supplier or dealer and used as heating fuel or to a person engaged in logging operations, mining operations, manufacturing, processing, drilling, exploration or well servicing, highway or other construction or railroad operations when the fuel is consumed directly in logging operations, mining operations, manufacturing, processing, drilling, exploration or well servicing, highway or other construction or railroad operations, or other nonhighway operations or uses is subject to a refund. The record of purchases under this paragraph shall be submitted quarterly on a form provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing the gallons purchased and license taxes paid. The refund form and receipts shall be invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase. The department shall not deduct the state sales and use tax imposed by the provisions of W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-16-311

from the refund to any person who possesses a valid sales or use tax license under W.S.

39-15-106

or

39-16-106

, or if the person is exempt from paying sales or use taxes under W.S.

39-15-105

or

39-16-105

. A copy of the most recent sales or use tax report or proof that the person is exempt from sales or use taxes shall accompany the claim for refund;

Diesel fuel purchased from a Wyoming licensed dealer, distributor, supplier or importer by the University of Wyoming and community colleges and public schools located in Wyoming are subject to refund of the license tax. The record of purchases under this paragraph shall be submitted monthly by the purchaser on refund forms provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing gallons purchased and license taxes paid. The refund form and receipts are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase.

The license tax under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii) is subject to refund on all diesel fuel sold in Wyoming for transportation of people, goods and equipment in interstate commerce and used outside Wyoming, provided that there is an adequate system for determining whether or not the diesel fuel is used in Wyoming. Nothing in this paragraph shall apply to the use, or sale or distribution for use, of diesel fuel in Wyoming. The refund request is invalid if not submitted within one (1) year.

Credits. Credit shall be given for tax paid on fuel purchased in Wyoming but not used in Wyoming and may be carried forward to succeeding reporting periods.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 2001, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2017 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or in a format required by” in (c)(v)(A), (C) and (D).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “The following shall apply” for “There are no specific applicable provisions for appeals for this article”; and added (b)(i) through (b)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-909, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-909 by ch. 51, § 2 were subsequently incorporated into this section.

Refund of LUST tax. —

Laws 2001, ch. 129, § 2, provides that all severance taxes distributed under title 39, chapter 14, to the corrective action account created by §

35-11-1424

and the financial responsibility account created by §

35-11-1427

are to be in the amount of fuel taxes collected under § 39-17-104(c) (§ 39-17-104(a)(iii)) and § 39-17-204(b) (§ 39-17-204(a)(ii)), less any refunds.

§ 39-17-210.
Statute of limitations.

The refund form and receipts, as provided for in W.S. 39-17-209(c)(i) are invalid if not submitted to the department within eighteen (18) months following date of purchase.

Each supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter, distributor and dealer shall keep and preserve the records relating to the purchase and sale of diesel fuels three (3) years. The department may authorize, by rule, alternate methods of preserving records required under this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2014 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), deleted “and (ii)” preceding “are invalid,” and substituted “eighteen (18) months” for “one (1) year.”

§ 39-17-211.
Distribution.

All diesel fuels license taxes and fees received by the department under this article shall be credited to the proper accounts.

The department shall deposit all license fees under W.S.

39-17-206

into the state highway fund with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer.

All taxes collected under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii) shall be deposited into the state highway fund with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer. The provisions of subsection (d) of this section shall not apply to the tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii). Any refund for any overpayment or for any other refund authorized by law of this one cent ($.01) tax shall be taken from the taxes collected pursuant to W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii).

The department shall:

Deduct not to exceed two percent (2%) of the taxes collected under this article corresponding to the actual cost of the administration of this article for the month and credit the money, from taxes collected before July 1, 1986, to a separate account which shall be used by the department to defray the cost of administration of this article, and from taxes collected on or after July 1, 1986, to the general fund, and from taxes collected on or after July 1, 1991, to the highway fund; and

Distribute monthly the remainder as follows:

Twenty percent (20%) shall be distributed to county treasurers. Each county treasurer shall credit the revenues to the county road fund for the improvement and maintenance of county roads. The distribution shall be based on:

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the area of the county bears to the total area of the state;

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the rural population including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) bears to the total rural population of the state;

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the assessed valuation of the county bears to the last total assessed valuation of the state.

Five percent (5%) shall be distributed to incorporated municipalities based on the ratio that the total population of the municipality bears to the total population of all municipalities within the state. Each treasurer of a municipality shall credit the revenues to the municipal street fund for the improvement and maintenance of municipal streets;

The remaining revenues shall be credited to the state highway fund for the maintenance, construction and reconstruction of state highways. Any funds deposited to the highway fund under this subparagraph which are attributable to the increase in fuel taxes authorized by 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 49, Section 1 and effective July 1, 2013 shall be separately accounted for by the department of transportation. The department shall provide a comprehensive report to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee on or before November 15 of each year, from the effective date of this act through November 15, 2020.

Deduct the pro rata share of the cost of collecting the taxes received from jet fuel used for aircraft at any municipal or county airport and distribute the remainder to the city, town or county where the airport is located. These funds shall be used for the maintenance of the airport.

There is created an account within the highway fund to be designated the multistate highway and fuel tax agreements account which shall be set apart and maintained by the department, to pay administrative costs of the multistate highway transportation agreement and the international fuel tax agreement. The department shall submit receipts and acknowledgements to the state treasurer of all transactions concerning the multistate highway and fuel tax agreements account.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 2.

There is created an account within the highway fund to be designated as the multi-lane highway funding account. Funds appropriated into the multi-lane highway funding account shall only be expended for multi-lane highway or other like transportation projects prioritized by the transportation commission to enhance safety and mobility and to facilitate economic and population growth. The budget for any project funded from this account shall include an amount for enhancements including landscaping and public art, in an amount not less than one-half of one percent (.5%) of the total budget amount for the project. The department of transportation shall coordinate the use of state funds in the account created by this subsection in combination with any federal funds received for road construction or repair when practical to provide additional travel or turning lanes in the furtherance of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; ch. 108, § 2; 2001, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 94, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 159, § 1, effective March 9, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted a “separate account” for “an account in the earmarked revenue fund” in (d)(i); and substituted “an account within the highway fund” for “an earmarked account within the highway trust fund” in (e).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (g).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d)(iii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (d)(ii)(A)(II), deleted “according to the last federal census” from the end.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “department” for “state treasurer” in (b) through (e); added “with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer” in (b) and the first sentence in (c); substituted “credited” for “transferred to the state treasurer who shall credit them” in (a); substituted “deposited” for “transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit them only” in the first sentence in (c); and added the last sentence in (e).

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 159, § 1, in (d)(ii)(c), added the second and third sentences.

Laws 2015, ch. 159, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-910, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-910 by ch. 51 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Underground storage tank funding scheme. —

An oil company's bare allegation that the state was funding an underground storage tank program by “fraudulently” transferring fuel tax proceeds required by art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., to be used for public highway expenses was insufficient to state a claim for fraud. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).